Massachusetts, session 194th, S310.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of Chapter 71 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby
amended by striking out the section in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following:-
"Section 3. Physical and mental health education shall be taught as required subjects in
all grades for all students in the public schools for the purpose of promoting the physical and
mental well-being of such students. Mental health education programs shall recognize multiple
dimensions of health by including mental health, and the relationship of physical health and
mental health, so as to enhance student understanding, attitudes and behaviors that promote
health, well-being and human dignity. Instruction in physical education may include
calisthenics, gymnastics and military drill; but no pupil shall be required to take part in any
military exercise if his parent or guardian is of any religious denomination conscientiously
of 4

opposed to bearing arms, or is himself so opposed, and the school committee is so notified in
writing; and no pupil shall be required to take part in physical education exercises if a licensed
physician certifies in writing that in his opinion such physical education exercises would be
injurious to the pupil."
SECTION 2. Section 1 of Chapter 76 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby
amended by striking out the section in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following:-
"Section 1. Every child between the minimum and maximum ages established for school
attendance by the board of education shall, subject to section fifteen, attend a public day school
in the town the student resides, or some other day school approved by the school committee,
during the number of days required by the board of education in each school year, unless the
child attends school in another town, for said number of days, under sections six to twelve,
inclusive, or attends an experimental school project established under an experimental school
plan, as provided in section one G of chapter fifteen, but such attendance shall not be required of
a child whose physical or mental condition is such as to render attendance inexpedient or
impracticable subject to the provisions of section three of chapter seventy-one B or of a child
granted an employment permit by the superintendent of schools when such superintendent
determines that the welfare of such child will be better served through the granting of such
permit, or of a child who is being otherwise instructed in a manner approved in advance by the
superintendent or the school committee. The superintendent of schools may transfer to any
specialized type of school on a full-time basis any child who possesses the educational
qualifications enumerated in this section and in the opinion of the superintendent would be
benefited by such transfer. The superintendent, or teachers in so far as authorized by him or by
the school committee, may excuse cases of necessary absence for other causes not exceeding
of 4

seven day sessions or fourteen half day sessions in any period of six months. Absences may also
be permitted for religious education at such times as the school committee may establish;
provided, that no public funds shall be appropriated or expended for such education or for
transportation incidental thereto; and provided, further, that such time shall be no more than one
hour each week. For the purposes of this section, school committees shall approve a private
school when satisfied that the instruction in all the studies required by law equals in
thoroughness and efficiency, and in the progress made therein, that in the public schools in the
same town, in addition to the incorporation of a mental health education program into the
curriculum in accordance with the provisions in section three of chapter seventy-one; but shall
not withhold such approval on account of religious teaching, and, in order to protect children
from the hazards of traffic and promote their safety, cities and towns may appropriate money for
conveying pupils to and from any schools approved under this section.
Except as herein provided, pupils who attend approved private schools of elementary and
high school grades shall be entitled to the same rights and privileges as to transportation to and
from school as are provided by law for pupils of public schools and shall not be denied such
transportation because their attendance is in a school which is conducted under religious auspices
or includes religious instruction in its curriculum. Each school committee shall provide
transportation for any pupil attending such an approved private school within the boundaries of
the school district, provided, however, that the distance between said pupil's residence and the
private school said pupil attends exceeds two miles or such other minimum distance as may be
established by the school committee for transportation of public school students. Any school
committee which is required by law to transport any pupil attending an approved private school
of 4

beyond the boundaries of the school district shall not be required to do so further than the
distance from the residence of such pupil to the public school he is entitled to attend.
The school committee of each town shall provide for and enforce the school attendance
of all children actually residing therein in accordance herewith."
of 4